Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Except as may be provided under KRS Chapter 3, and notwithstanding any other law to
the contrary, the courts of this Commonwealth shall have exclusive jurisdiction in any
legal action arising from work performed by a contractor involving real property
located in this state. As used in this section, "real property" includes any:
(1) Estate, whether held by leasehold or in fee simple;
(2) Easement;
(3) Fixture or appurtenance;
(4) Other interest or right in and to the property; and
(5) Improvements and structures on the property.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/5/2025 3:21 PM Jacketed